src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-armij_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../generator-gt-norm.hfstol
    Morph: ../../analyser-gt-norm.hfstol
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - armij: # Noun 225 'eng /est armee/fin' - full paradigm
     armij+N+Sg+Nom: armij
     armij+N+Sg+Gen: armij
     armij+N+Sg+Par: armijt
     armij+N+Sg+Dat: armijõn
     armij+N+Sg+Ins: armijõks
     armij+N+Sg+Ill: armijõ
     armij+N+Sg+Ela: armijst
     armij+N+Pl+Nom: armijd
     armij+N+Pl+Gen: armijd
     armij+N+Pl+Par: armijḑi
     armij+N+Pl+Dat: armijdõn
     armij+N+Pl+Ins: armijdõks
     armij+N+Pl+Ill: armijži
     armij+N+Pl+Ela: armijšti
